Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2357
Public power and irrigation district funds; depositories; power to enter into agreement.

Every depository is authorized to secure deposits by giving bond or giving security, as provided in sections 77-2353 to 77-2361, and otherwise to enter into and become a party to any contract or arrangement, not inconsistent with the provisions hereof, as may be reasonably necessary or proper to render fully effective the provisions of such sections. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1941, c. 160, § 2, p. 642;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2538;

R.S.1943, § 77-2357;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 70;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 46;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 66.